th: ประเภทของซอส: อัลเฟรโด; เบียร์เนส; เบชาเมล; คาร์โบนารา; เชดดาร์ชีส; ชีส; กระเทียม; สมุนไพร; ฮอลแลนเดซ; มอร์เนย์; เห็ด; มัสตาร์ด; พริกไทย; โรมานอฟฟ์; ซีฟู้ด; ซูพรีม; ทรัฟเฟิล; วอดก้า; ไวน์ขาว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Raznovrsni umaci: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Bešamel; Carbonara; Cheddar sir; Sir; Češnjak; Začinsko bilje; Hollandaise; Mornay; Gljive; Senf; Zrnati papar; Romanoff; Plodovi mora; Supreme; Tartuf; Votka; Bijelo vino; Ostalo
sk-SK: Druh omáčky: Alfredo; Bernská; Bešamel; Carbonara; Čedar; Syrová; Cesnaková; Bylinková; Holandská; Mornay; Hubová; Horčicová; Koreniová; Romanoff; Z morských plodov; Suprême; Hľuzovková; Vodková; Z bieleho vína; Iné
ko: 소스 유형: 알프레도; 베어네이즈; 베샤멜; 카르보나라; 체다 치즈; 치즈; 갈릭; 허브; 홀랜다이즈; 모르네; 머시룸; 머스터드; 페퍼콘; 로마노프; 해산물; 슈프림; 트러플; 보드카; 화이트 와인; 기타
pt-BR: Molho variedade: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Queijo cheddar; Queijo; Alho; Ervas; Holandês; Mornay; Cogumelos; Mostarda; Pimenta-em-grão; Romanoff; Frutos do mar; Supremo; Trufas; Vodca; Vinho branco; Outros
ru: Разновидность соуса: Альфредо; Беарнский; Бешамель; Карбонара; Сыр чеддер; Сырный; Чесночный; С травами; Голландский; Морне; Грибной; Горчичный; Перечный; Романов; Из морепродуктов; Супрем; Трюфельный; Водочный; Из белого вина; Другой
vi: Các loại nước sốt: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Phô mai cheddar; Phô mai; Tỏi; Thảo mộc; Hollandaise; Mornay; Nấm; Mù tạt; Tiêu hạt; Romanoff; Hải sản; Suprême; Nấm truffle; Vodka; Rượu vang trắng; Khác
bg-BG: Вид сос: Алфредо; Беарнез; Бешамел; Карбонара; Сирене чедър; Сирене; Чеснов; Билков; Холандез; Морне; Гъбен; Горчица; Пипер; Романов; Морски дарове; Сюпрем; Трюфел; Водка; Бяло вино; Друго
ja: ソースの種類: アルフレッド; ベアルネーズ; ベシャメル; カルボナーラ; チェダーチーズ; チーズ; ガーリック; ハーブ; オランデーズ; モルネー; マッシュルーム; マスタード; ペッパーコーン; ロマノフ; シーフード; シュプレーム; トリュフ; ウォッカ; 白ワイン; その他
da: Sauce-variant: Alfredo; Bearnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddarost; Ost; Hvidløg; Urter; Hollandaise; Mornay; Svampe; Sennep; Peberkorn; Romanoff; Fisk og skaldyr; Supreme; Trøffel; Vodka; Hvidvin; Andet
fr: Variété de sauce: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Fromage cheddar; Fromage; Ail; Aux herbes; Hollandaise; Mornay; Aux champignons; Moutarde; Au poivre; Romanoff; Fruits de mer; Suprême; Truffe; Vodka; Vin blanc; Autre
el: Ποικιλία σάλτσας: Alfredo; Μπεαρνέζ; Μπεσαμέλ; Καρμπονάρα; Τυρί τσένταρ; Τυρί; Σκόρδο; Βότανα; Ολλανδέζ; Μορνέ (Mornay); Μανιτάρια; Μουστάρδα; Κόκκοι πιπεριού; Ρομανόφ; Θαλασσινά; Σουπρέμ; Τρούφα; Βότκα; Λευκό κρασί; Άλλη
zh-CN: 酱汁种类: 阿尔弗雷多酱; 贝阿恩酱; 白酱; 奶油培根酱; 切达奶酪; 奶酪; 大蒜; 香草; 荷兰酱; 莫尔奈酱; 蘑菇; 芥末; 胡椒; 罗曼诺夫酱; 海鲜; 至尊酱; 松露; 伏特加; 白葡萄酒; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade do molho: Alfredo; Bearnês; Béchamel; Carbonara; Queijo cheddar; Queijo; Alho; Ervas; Holandês; Mornay; Cogumelos; Mostarda; Pimenta; Romanoff; Marisco; Supremo; Trufa; Vodka; Vinho branco; Outro
zh-TW: 醬料種類: 阿爾弗雷多醬; 伯納西醬; 貝夏梅醬; 培根蛋黃醬; 切達起司; 起司; 大蒜; 香草; 荷蘭醬; 莫爾奈醬; 蘑菇; 芥末; 胡椒; 羅曼諾夫醬; 海鮮; 蘇普雷姆醬; 松露; 伏特加; 白酒; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta omake: Alfredo; Bearneška; Bešamel; Carbonara; Sir čedar; Sir; Česen; Zelišča; Holandska; Mornay; Gobe; Gorčica; Poper; Romanoff; Morski sadeži; Suprême; Tartuf; Vodka; Belo vino; Drugo
fi: Kastiketyyppi: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddarjuusto; Juusto; Valkosipuli; Yrtti; Hollandaise; Mornay; Sieni; Sinappi; Pippuri; Romanoff; Merenelävät; Supreme; Tryffeli; Vodka; Valkoviini; Muu
nb: Sausvariant: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddarost; Ost; Hvitløk; Urte; Hollandaise; Mornay; Sopp; Sennep; Pepper; Romanoff; Sjømat; Suprême; Trøffel; Vodka; Hvitvin; Annet
hu: Szószfajta: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Besamel; Carbonara; Cheddar sajt; Sajt; Fokhagyma; Zöldfűszeres; Hollandi; Mornay; Gomba; Mustár; Bors; Romanoff; Tenger gyümölcsei; Supreme; Szarvasgomba; Vodka; Fehérbor; Egyéb
en: Sauce variety: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddar cheese; Cheese; Garlic; Herb; Hollandaise; Mornay; Mushroom; Mustard; Peppercorn; Romanoff; Seafood; Supreme; Truffle; Vodka; White wine; Other
nl: Saus variëteit: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddarkaas; Kaas; Knoflook; Kruiden; Hollandaise; Mornay; Champignon; Mosterd; Peperkorrel; Romanoff; Zeevruchten; Suprême; Truffel; Wodka; Witte wijn; Overige
pl: Odmiana sosu: Alfredo; Berneński; Beszamel; Carbonara; Serowy (Cheddar); Serowy; Czosnkowy; Ziołowy; Holenderski; Mornay; Grzybowy; Musztardowy; Pieprzowy; Romanow; Z owoców morza; Supreme; Truflowy; Z wódką; Z białego wina; Inny
ro-RO: Sortiment de sos: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Brânză Cheddar; Brânză; Usturoi; Ierburi; Olandez; Mornay; Ciuperci; Muștar; Piper boabe; Romanoff; Fructe de mare; Suprême; Trufe; Vodcă; Vin alb; Altele
cs: Různé druhy omáček: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Bešamel; Carbonara; Čedar; Sýrová; Česneková; Bylinková; Holandská; Mornay; Houbová; Hořčicová; Pepřová; Romanoff; Z mořských plodů; Suprême; Lanýžová; S vodkou; Z bílého vína; Jiné
de: Saucenart: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddar-Käse; Käse; Knoblauch; Kräuter; Hollandaise; Mornay; Pilz; Senf; Pfefferkorn; Romanoff; Meeresfrüchte; Suprême; Trüffel; Wodka; Weißwein; Sonstige
lt-LT: Padažo rūšis: „Alfredo“; Berno; Bešamelio; „Carbonara“; Čederio sūrio; Sūrio; Česnakų; Žolelių; Olandiškas; „Mornay“; Grybų; Garstyčių; Pipirų; „Romanoff“; Jūros gėrybių; „Supreme“; Trumų; Degtinės; Baltojo vyno; Kita
tr: Sos çeşitleri: Alfredo; Béarnaise; Beşamel; Carbonara; Çedar peyniri; Peynir; Sarımsak; Ot; Holandez; Mornay; Mantar; Hardal; Tane biber; Romanoff; Deniz ürünleri; Supreme; Trüf; Votka; Beyaz şarap; Diğer
sv: Såsvariant: Alfredo; Bearnaise; Béchamel; Carbonara; Cheddarost; Ost; Vitlök; Ört; Hollandaise; Mornay; Svamp; Senap; Peppar; Romanoff; Skaldjur; Suprême; Tryffel; Vodka; Vitt vin; Övrigt
es: Variedad de salsas: Alfredo; Bearnesa; Bechamel; Carbonara; Queso cheddar; Queso; Ajo; Hierbas; Holandesa; Mornay; Champiñones; Mostaza; Pimienta; Romanoff; Mariscos; Suprema; Trufa; Vodka; Vino blanco; Otra
it: Varietà di salsa: Alfredo; Bernese; Besciamella; Carbonara; Formaggio cheddar; Formaggio; Aglio; Erbe aromatiche; Olandese; Mornay; Funghi; Senape; Pepe in grani; Romanoff; Frutti di mare; Suprema; Tartufo; Vodka; Vino bianco; Altro